Florida, session 2026, HB315.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
189
190 Section 1. (1) This act may be cited as the "Florida
191 Economic Prosperity and Immigration Act."
192 (2) The purpose of this act is to show that although the
193 administration of immigration is incredibly complex and
194 immigration regulation is the role of the Federal Government,
195 this state should do its part, when possible, by welcoming,
196 valuing, and upholding the dignity of all immigrants who call
197 the Sunshine State home.
198 Section 2. Paragraph (a) of subsection (3) of section
199 20.60, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
200 20.60 Department of Commerce; creation; powers and
Page 8 of 88
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb315-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 315 2026
201 duties.—
202 (3)(a) The following divisions and offices of the
203 Department of Commerce are established:
204 1. The Division of Economic Development.
205 2. The Division of Community Development.
206 3. The Division of Workforce Services.
207 4. The Division of Finance and Administration.
208 5. The Division of Information Technology.
209 6. The Office of the Secretary.
210 7. The Office of Economic Accountability and Transparency,
211 which shall:
212 a. Oversee the department's critical objectives as
213 determined by the secretary and make sure that the department's
214 key objectives are clearly communicated to the public.
215 b. Organize department resources, expertise, data, and
216 research to focus on and solve the complex economic challenges
217 facing the state.
218 c. Provide leadership for the department's priority issues
219 that require integration of policy, management, and critical
220 objectives from multiple programs and organizations internal and
221 external to the department; and organize and manage external
222 communication on such priority issues.
223 d. Promote and facilitate key department initiatives to
224 address priority economic issues and explore data and identify
225 opportunities for innovative approaches to address such economic
Page 9 of 88
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb315-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 315 2026
226 issues.
227 e. Promote strategic planning for the department.
228 8. The Office for New Americans, which shall:
229 a. Create and implement a statewide strategy and program
230 to foster and promote immigrant and refugee inclusion in this
231 state in order to improve economic mobility, enhance civic
232 participation, and improve receiving communities' openness to
233 immigrants and refugees.
234 b. Address this state's workforce needs by connecting
235 employers and job seekers within the immigrant and refugee
236 community.
237 c. Serve as an information clearinghouse for state
238 agencies on immigration-related policy issues and coordinate
239 among agencies as appropriate to make policy recommendations.
240 d. Act as a point of contact for state licensing boards
241 and other agencies dealing with professional regulations.
242 e. Identify and support implementation of programs and
243 strategies, including the creation of alternative employment
244 pathways, to reduce employment barriers for immigrants and
245 refugees.
246 f. Work with state agencies and community and foundation
247 partners to undertake studies and to research and analyze
248 economic and demographic trends to better understand and serve
249 this state's immigrant and refugee communities.
250 g. Coordinate and establish best practices for language
Page 10 of 88
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb315-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 315 2026
251 access initiatives for all state agencies.
252 Section 3. Subsection (2) of section 322.08, Florida
253 Statutes, is amended to read:
254 322.08 Application for license; requirements for license
255 and identification card forms.—
256 (2) Each such application shall include the following
257 information regarding the applicant:
258 (a) Full name (first, middle or maiden, and last), gender,
259 proof of social security card number satisfactory to the
260 department, which may include a military identification card,
261 county of residence, mailing address, proof of residential
262 address satisfactory to the department, country of birth, and a
263 brief description. An applicant who cannot provide a social
264 security card number must provide proof of a number associated
265 with a document establishing identity, as specified in paragraph
266 (c).
267 (b) Proof of birth date satisfactory to the department.
268 (c) Proof of identity satisfactory to the department. Such
269 proof must include one of the following documents issued to the
270 applicant:
271 1. A driver license record or identification card record
272 from another jurisdiction which complies with the REAL ID Act of
273 2005, Pub. L. No. 109-13, and which required the applicant to
274 submit a document for identification which is substantially
275 similar to a document required under subparagraph 2.,
Page 11 of 88
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb315-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 315 2026
276 subparagraph 3., subparagraph 4., subparagraph 5., subparagraph
277 6., subparagraph 7., or subparagraph 8.;
278 2. A certified copy of a United States birth certificate.;
279 3. A valid, unexpired United States passport or passport
280 card.;
281 4. A naturalization certificate issued by the United
282 States Department of Homeland Security.;
283 5. A valid, unexpired alien registration receipt card
284 (green card).;
285 6. A Consular Report of Birth Abroad provided by the
286 United States Department of State.;
287 7. An unexpired employment authorization card issued by
288 the United States Department of Homeland Security.; or
289 8. Proof of any of the following documents nonimmigrant
290 classification provided by the United States Department of
291 Homeland Security, for an original driver license. In order to
292 prove nonimmigrant classification, an applicant must provide at
293 least one of the following documents. In addition, the
294 department may require applicants to produce United States
295 Department of Homeland Security documents for the sole purpose
296 of establishing the maintenance of, or efforts to maintain,
297 continuous lawful presence:
298 a. A notice of hearing from an immigration court
299 scheduling a hearing on any proceeding.
300 b. A notice from the Board of Immigration Appeals
Page 12 of 88
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb315-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 315 2026
301 acknowledging pendency of an appeal.
302 c. A notice of the approval of an application for
303 adjustment of status issued by the United States Citizenship and
304 Immigration Services.
305 d. An official documentation confirming the filing of a
306 petition for asylum or refugee status or any other relief issued
307 by the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services.
308 e. A notice of action transferring any pending matter from
309 another jurisdiction to this state issued by the United States
310 Citizenship and Immigration Services.
311 f. An order of an immigration judge or immigration officer
312 granting relief which that authorizes the alien to live and work
313 in the United States, including, but not limited to, asylum.
314 g. Evidence that an application is pending for adjustment
315 of status to that of an alien lawfully admitted for permanent
316 residence in the United States or conditional permanent resident
317 status in the United States, if a visa number is available
318 having a current priority date for processing by the United
319 States Citizenship and Immigration Services.
320 h. An unexpired passport issued by the government of
321 another country with:
322 (I) A stamp or mark affixed by the Federal Government onto
323 the passport to evidence and authorize lawful presence in the
324 United States; or
325 (II) An unexpired I-94, or current permanent resident
Page 13 of 88
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb315-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 315 2026
326 card, or unexpired immigrant visa, issued by the Federal
327 Government.
328 9. A passport issued by a foreign government.
329 10. A birth certificate issued by a foreign government.
330 11. A consular identification document.
331 12. A national identification card issued by a foreign
332 government.
333 13. A driver license issued by a foreign government. If
334 the foreign driver license is in a language other than English,
335 the driver license must be accompanied by a certified
336 translation or an affidavit of translation into English.
337 14. A school document, including any document issued by a
338 public or private primary or secondary school or a postsecondary
339 institution, college, or university, which either includes the
340 applicant's date of birth or, if a foreign school document, is
341 sealed by the school and includes a photograph of the applicant
342 at the age the record was issued.
343 15. A court document issued by or filed with a state
344 government in which the applicant is named as a party to a court
345 proceeding.
346 16. An income tax return.
347 17. A marriage license on which the applicant is named as
348 a party. If the language on the marriage license is a language
349 other than English, the marriage license must be accompanied by
350 a certified translation or an affidavit of translation into
Page 14 of 88
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb315-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 315 2026
351 English.
352 18. A judgment for the dissolution of a marriage on which
353 the applicant is named as a party. If the language on the
354 judgment is a language other than English, the judgment must be
355 accompanied by a certified translation or an affidavit of
356 translation into English.
357
358 A driver license or temporary permit issued based on documents
359 required in subparagraph 7., or subparagraph 8., subparagraph
360 9., subparagraph 10., subparagraph 11., subparagraph 12., or
361 subparagraph 13. is valid for a period not to exceed the
362 expiration date of the document presented or 8 years, whichever
363 date first occurs. A driver license or temporary permit issued
364 based on documents required in subparagraph 14., subparagraph
365 15., subparagraph 16., subparagraph 17., or subparagraph 18. is
366 valid for 8 years 1 year.
367 (d) Whether the applicant has previously been licensed to
368 drive, and, if so, when and by what state, and whether any such
369 license or driving privilege has ever been disqualified,
370 revoked, or suspended, or whether an application has ever been
371 refused, and, if so, the date of and reason for such
372 disqualification, suspension, revocation, or refusal.
373 (e) Each such application may include fingerprints and
374 other unique biometric means of identity.
375 Section 4. Subsection (1) of section 322.12, Florida
Page 15 of 88
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb315-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 315 2026
376 Statutes, is amended to read:
377 322.12 Examination of applicants.—
378 (1) It is the intent of the Legislature that every
379 applicant for an original driver license in this state be
380 required to pass an examination pursuant to this section.
381 However, the department may waive the knowledge, endorsement,
382 and skills tests for an applicant who is otherwise qualified,
383 except for an applicant who provides proof of identity under s.
384 322.08(2)(c)9., 10., 11., 12., 13., 14., 15., 16., 17., or 18.,
385 and who surrenders a valid driver license from another state or
386 a province of Canada, or a valid driver license issued by the
387 United States Armed Forces, if the driver applies for a Florida
388 license of an equal or lesser classification. An applicant who
389 fails to pass the initial knowledge test incurs a $10 fee for
390 each subsequent test, to be deposited into the Highway Safety
391 Operating Trust Fund, except that if a subsequent test is
392 administered by the tax collector, the tax collector shall
393 retain such $10 fee, less the general revenue service charge set
394 forth in s. 215.20(1). An applicant who fails to pass the
395 initial skills test incurs a $20 fee for each subsequent test,
396 to be deposited into the Highway Safety Operating Trust Fund,
397 except that if a subsequent test is administered by the tax
398 collector, the tax collector shall retain such $20 fee, less the
399 general revenue service charge set forth in s. 215.20(1). A
400 person who seeks to retain a hazardous-materials endorsement,
Page 16 of 88
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb315-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 315 2026
401 pursuant to s. 322.57(1)(e), must pass the hazardous-materials
402 test, upon surrendering his or her commercial driver license, if
403 the person has not taken and passed the hazardous-materials test
404 within 2 years before applying for a commercial driver license
405 in this state.
406 Section 5. Subsection (4) of section 322.142, Florida
407 Statutes, is amended, and subsection (5) is added to that
408 section, to read:
409 322.142 Color photographic or digital imaged licenses;
410 protection of personal information.—
411 (4) The department may maintain a film negative or print
412 file. The department shall maintain a record of the digital
413 images and signatures image and signature of the licensees,
414 together with other data required by the department for
415 identification and retrieval. Reproductions from the file or
416 digital record are exempt from the provisions of s. 119.07(1)
417 and may be made and issued only for any of the following
418 purposes:
419 (a) For departmental administrative purposes.;
420 (b) For the issuance of duplicate licenses.;
421 (c) In response to law enforcement agency requests, except
422 as provided in subsection (5).;
423 (d) To the Department of Business and Professional
424 Regulation and the Department of Health pursuant to an
425 interagency agreement for the purpose of accessing digital
Page 17 of 88
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb315-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 315 2026
426 images for reproduction of licenses issued by the Department of
427 Business and Professional Regulation or the Department of
428 Health.;
429 (e) To the Department of State or a supervisor of
430 elections pursuant to an interagency agreement to facilitate
431 determinations of eligibility of voter registration applicants
432 and registered voters in accordance with ss. 98.045 and 98.075.;
433 (f) To the Department of Revenue pursuant to an
434 interagency agreement for use in establishing paternity and
435 establishing, modifying, or enforcing support obligations in
436 Title IV-D cases.;
437 (g) To the Department of Children and Families pursuant to
438 an interagency agreement to conduct protective investigations
439 under part III of chapter 39 and chapter 415.;
440 (h) To the Department of Children and Families pursuant to
441 an interagency agreement specifying the number of employees in
442 each of that department's regions to be granted access to the
443 records for use as verification of identity to expedite the
444 determination of eligibility for public assistance and for use
445 in public assistance fraud investigations.;
446 (i) To the Agency for Health Care Administration pursuant
447 to an interagency agreement for the purpose of authorized
448 agencies verifying photographs in the Care Provider Background
449 Screening Clearinghouse authorized under s. 435.12.;
450 (j) To the Department of Financial Services pursuant to an
Page 18 of 88
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb315-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 315 2026
451 interagency agreement to facilitate the location of owners of
452 unclaimed property, the validation of unclaimed property claims,
453 the identification of fraudulent or false claims, and the
454 investigation of allegations of violations of the insurance code
455 by licensees and unlicensed persons.;
456 (k) To the Department of Commerce pursuant to an
457 interagency agreement to facilitate the validation of
458 reemployment assistance claims and the identification of
459 fraudulent or false reemployment assistance claims.;
460 (l) To district medical examiners pursuant to an
461 interagency agreement for the purpose of identifying a deceased
462 individual, determining cause of death, and notifying next of
463 kin of any investigations, including autopsies and other
464 laboratory examinations, authorized in s. 406.11.;
465 (m) To the following persons for the purpose of
466 identifying a person as part of the official work of a court:
467 1. A justice or judge of this state;
468 2. An employee of the state courts system who works in a
469 position that is designated in writing for access by the Chief
470 Justice of the Supreme Court or a chief judge of a district or
471 circuit court, or by his or her designee; or
472 3. A government employee who performs functions on behalf
473 of the state courts system in a position that is designated in
474 writing for access by the Chief Justice or a chief judge, or by
475 his or her designee.; or
Page 19 of 88
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb315-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 315 2026
476 (n) To the Agency for Health Care Administration pursuant
477 to an interagency agreement to prevent health care fraud. If the
478 Agency for Health Care Administration enters into an agreement
479 with a private entity to carry out duties relating to health
480 care fraud prevention, such contracts shall include, but need
481 not be limited to:
482 1. Provisions requiring internal controls and audit
483 processes to identify access, use, and unauthorized access of
484 information.
485 2. A requirement to report unauthorized access or use to
486 the Agency for Health Care Administration within 1 business day
487 after the discovery of the unauthorized access or use.
488 3. Provisions for liquidated damages for unauthorized
489 access or use of no less than $5,000 per occurrence.
490 (5)(a) This subsection shall be known and may be cited as
491 the "Driver License Privacy Act."
492 (b) For purposes of this subsection, the term "agency that
493 primarily enforces immigration law" includes, but is not limited
494 to, United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement, United
495 States Customs and Border Protection, or any successor agencies
496 that have similar duties.
497 (c) Except as required for the department to issue or
498 renew a driver license or learner's driver license that meets
499 federal standards for identification, the department may not
500 disclose or make accessible, in any manner, to any agency that
Page 20 of 88
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb315-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 315 2026
501 primarily enforces immigration law or to any employee or agent
502 of such agency, photographs and related information pertaining
503 to persons whose image or personal identifying information is
504 possessed by the department, unless the department is presented
505 with a lawful court order or judicial warrant signed by a judge
506 appointed under Article III of the United States Constitution.
507 Within 3 days after receiving a request for information under
508 this subsection from such an agency, the department must notify
509 the person about whom such information was requested of the
510 request and the identity of the agency that made such request.
511 (d) Before any person or entity receives or has access to
512 information from the department under this subsection, the
513 department must require such person or entity to certify to the
514 department that the person or entity will not:
515 1. Use such information for civil immigration purposes; or
516 2. Disclose such information to any agency that primarily
517 enforces immigration law or to any employee or agent of any such
518 agency unless such disclosure is pursuant to a cooperative
519 arrangement between municipal, state, and federal agencies, if
520 the arrangement does not enforce immigration law and if the
521 disclosure is limited to the specific information being sought
522 pursuant to the arrangement.
523 (e) In addition to any records required to be kept
524 pursuant to 18 U.S.C. s. 2721(c), any person or entity that
525 receives or has access to information from the department under
Page 21 of 88
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb315-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 315 2026
526 this subsection must keep both of the following records for a
527 period of 5 years:
528 1. Records of all the uses of such department information.
529 2. Records that identify each person or entity that
530 primarily enforces immigration law which receives such
531 department information from the person or entity.
532 (f) The records identified in paragraph (e) must be
533 maintained in a manner and form prescribed by department rule
534 and must be available for inspection by the department.
535 Section 6. Subsection (3) of section 322.17, Florida
536 Statutes, is amended to read:
537 322.17 Replacement licenses and permits.—
538 (3) Notwithstanding any other provision provisions of this
539 chapter, if a licensee establishes his or her identity for a
540 driver license using an identification document authorized under
541 s. 322.08(2)(c)7.-18. s. 322.08(2)(c)7. or 8., the licensee may
542 not obtain a duplicate or replacement instruction permit or
543 driver license except in person and upon submission of an
544 identification document authorized under s. 322.08(2)(c)7.-18.
545 s. 322.08(2)(c)7. or 8.
546 Section 7. Paragraph (d) of subsection (2) and paragraph
547 (c) of subsection (4) of section 322.18, Florida Statutes, are
548 amended to read:
549 322.18 Original applications, licenses, and renewals;
550 expiration of licenses; delinquent licenses.—
Page 22 of 88
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb315-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 315 2026
551 (2) Each applicant who is entitled to the issuance of a
552 driver license, as provided in this section, shall be issued a
553 driver license, as follows:
554 (d)1. Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter,
555 if an applicant establishes his or her identity for a driver
556 license using a document authorized in s. 322.08(2)(c)7.-13. s.
557 322.08(2)(c)7. or 8., the driver license shall expire 8 years 1
558 year after the date of issuance or upon the expiration date
559 cited on the United States Department of Homeland Security
560 documents, whichever date first occurs.
561 2. Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, if
562 an applicant establishes his or her identity for a driver
563 license using a document authorized in s. 322.08(2)(c)14.-18.,
564 the driver license shall expire 8 years after the date of
565 issuance.
566 (4)
567 (c)1. Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter,
568 if a licensee establishes his or her identity for a driver
569 license using an identification document authorized under s.
570 322.08(2)(c)7.-13. s. 322.08(2)(c)7. or 8., the licensee may not
571 renew the driver license except in person and upon submission of
572 an identification document authorized under s. 322.08(2)(c)7.-
573 13. s. 322.08(2)(c)7. or 8. A driver license renewed under this
574 subparagraph paragraph expires 8 years 1 year after the date of
575 issuance or upon the expiration date cited on the United States
Page 23 of 88
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb315-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 315 2026
576 Department of Homeland Security documents, whichever date first
577 occurs.
578 2. Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, if
579 a licensee establishes his or her identity for a driver license
580 using an identification document authorized under s.
581 322.08(2)(c)14.-18., the licensee may only renew the driver
582 license in person and upon submission of an identification
583 document authorized under s. 322.08(2)(c)14.-18. A driver
584 license renewed under this subparagraph expires 8 years after
585 the date of issuance.
586 Section 8. Subsection (5) of section 322.19, Florida
587 Statutes, is amended to read:
588 322.19 Change of address, name, or citizenship status.—
589 (5) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter,
590 if a licensee established his or her identity for a driver
591 license using an identification document authorized under s.
592 322.08(2)(c)7.-18. s. 322.08(2)(c)7. or 8., the licensee may not
593 change his or her name or address except in person and upon
594 submission of an identification document authorized under s.
595 322.08(2)(c)7.-18. s. 322.08(2)(c)7. or 8.
596 Section 9. Section 395.3027, Florida Statutes, is
597 repealed.
598 Section 10. Subsection (6) is added to section 402.308,
599 Florida Statutes, to read:
600 402.308 Issuance of license.—
Page 24 of 88
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb315-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 315 2026
601 (6) IMMIGRATION STATUS.—The department or a local
602 licensing agency may not deny a child care facility a license or
603 a license renewal based solely on the immigration status of a
604 child under the care of the child care facility.
605 Section 11. Paragraph (f) of subsection (2) of section
606 448.095, Florida Statutes, is redesignated as paragraph (e), and
607 paragraphs (b) and (e) of subsection (2), paragraph (a) of
608 subsection (4), subsection (5), and paragraphs (a) and (b) of
609 subsection (6) of that section are amended, to read:
610 448.095 Employment eligibility.—
611 (2) EMPLOYMENT VERIFICATION.—
612 (b)1. A public agency shall use the E-Verify system to
613 verify a new employee's employment eligibility as required under
614 paragraph (a).
615 2. Beginning on July 1, 2023, a private employer with 25
616 or more employees shall use the E-Verify system to verify a new
617 employee's employment eligibility as required under paragraph
618 (a).
619 2.3. Each employer required to use the E-Verify system
620 under this paragraph must certify on its first return each
621 calendar year to the tax service provider that it is in
622 compliance with this section when making contributions to or
623 reimbursing the state's unemployment compensation or
624 reemployment assistance system. An employer that voluntarily
625 uses the E-Verify system may also make such a certification on
Page 25 of 88
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb315-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 315 2026
626 its first return each calendar year in order to document such
627 use.
628 (e) An employer may not continue to employ an unauthorized
629 alien after obtaining knowledge that a person is or has become
630 an unauthorized alien.
631 (4) DEFENSES.—
632 (a) An employer that uses the E-Verify system or, if that
633 system is unavailable, the Employment Eligibility Verification
634 form (Form I-9) as provided in paragraph (2)(c), with respect to
635 the employment of an unauthorized alien has established a
636 rebuttable presumption that the employer has not violated s.
637 448.09 with respect to such employment.
638 (5) PUBLIC AGENCY CONTRACTING.—
639 (a) A public agency must require in any contract that the
640 contractor, and any subcontractor thereof, register with and use
641 the E-Verify system or the Employment Eligibility Verification
642 form (Form I-9) to verify the work authorization status of all
643 new employees of the contractor or subcontractor. A public
644 agency or a contractor or subcontractor thereof may not enter
645 into a contract unless each party to the contract registers with
646 and uses the E-Verify system or the Employment Eligibility
647 Verification form (Form I-9).
648 (b) If a contractor enters into a contract with a
649 subcontractor, the subcontractor must provide the contractor
650 with an affidavit stating that the subcontractor does not
Page 26 of 88
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb315-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 315 2026
651 employ, contract with, or subcontract with an unauthorized
652 alien. The contractor shall maintain a copy of such affidavit
653 for the duration of the contract.
654 (c)1. A public agency, contractor, or subcontractor who
655 has a good faith belief that a person or an entity with which it
656 is contracting has knowingly violated s. 448.09(1) shall
657 terminate the contract with the person or entity.
658 2. A public agency that has a good faith belief that a
659 subcontractor knowingly violated this subsection, but the
660 contractor otherwise complied with this subsection, shall
661 promptly notify the contractor and order the contractor to
662 immediately terminate the contract with the subcontractor.
663 3. A contract terminated under this paragraph is not a
664 breach of contract and may not be considered as such. If a
665 public agency terminates a contract with a contractor under this
666 paragraph, the contractor may not be awarded a public contract
667 for at least 1 year after the date on which the contract was
668 terminated. A contractor is liable for any additional costs
669 incurred by a public agency as a result of the termination of a
670 contract.
671 (d) A public agency, contractor, or subcontractor may file
672 a cause of action with a circuit or county court to challenge a
673 termination under paragraph (c) no later than 20 calendar days
674 after the date on which the contract was terminated.
675 (6) COMPLIANCE.—
Page 27 of 88
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb315-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 315 2026
676 (a) In addition to the requirements under s. 288.061(6),
677 beginning on July 1, 2024, if the Department of Commerce
678 determines that an employer failed to use the E-Verify system or
679 the Employment Eligibility Verification form (Form I-9) to
680 verify the employment eligibility of employees as required under
681 this section, the department must notify the employer of the
682 department's determination of noncompliance and provide the
683 employer with 30 days to cure the noncompliance.
684 (b) If the Department of Commerce determines that an
685 employer failed to use the E-Verify system or the Employment
686 Eligibility Verification form (Form I-9) as required under this
687 section three times in any 24-month period, the department must
688 impose a fine of $1,000 per day until the employer provides
689 sufficient proof to the department that the noncompliance is
690 cured. Noncompliance constitutes grounds for the suspension of
691 all licenses issued by a licensing agency subject to chapter 120
692 until the noncompliance is cured.
693 Section 12. Subsection (3) of section 454.021, Florida
694 Statutes, is amended to read:
695 454.021 Attorneys; admission to practice law; Supreme
696 Court to govern and regulate.—
697 (3) Upon certification by the Florida Board of Bar
698 Examiners that an applicant who is an unauthorized immigrant who
699 was brought to the United States as a minor; has been present in
700 the United States for more than 10 years; has received
Page 28 of 88
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb315-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 315 2026
701 documented employment authorization from the United States
702 Citizenship and Immigration Services (USCIS); has been issued a
703 social security number; if a male, has registered with the
704 Selective Service System if required to do so under the Military
705 Selective Service Act, 50 U.S.C. App. 453; and has fulfilled all
706 requirements for admission to practice law in this state, the
707 Supreme Court of Florida may admit that applicant as an attorney
708 at law authorized to practice in this state and may direct an
709 order be entered upon the court's records to that effect.
710 Section 13. Subsection (2) of section 760.01, Florida
711 Statutes, is amended to read:
712 760.01 Purposes; construction; title.—
713 (2) The general purposes of the Florida Civil Rights Act
714 of 1992 are to secure for all individuals within the state
715 freedom from discrimination because of race, color, religion,
716 sex, pregnancy, national origin, age, handicap, immigration
717 status, or marital status and thereby to protect their interest
718 in personal dignity, to make available to the state their full
719 productive capacities, to secure the state against domestic
720 strife and unrest, to preserve the public safety, health, and
721 general welfare, and to promote the interests, rights, and
722 privileges of individuals within the state.
723 Section 14. Section 760.05, Florida Statutes, is amended
724 to read:
725 760.05 Functions of the commission.—The commission shall
Page 29 of 88
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb315-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 315 2026
726 promote and encourage fair treatment and equal opportunity for
727 all persons regardless of race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy,
728 national origin, age, handicap, immigration status, or marital
729 status and mutual understanding and respect among all members of
730 all economic, social, racial, religious, and ethnic groups; and
731 shall endeavor to eliminate discrimination against, and
732 antagonism between, religious, racial, and ethnic groups and
733 their members.
734 Section 15. Section 760.07, Florida Statutes, is amended
735 to read:
736 760.07 Remedies for unlawful discrimination.—Any violation
737 of any Florida statute that makes unlawful discrimination
738 because of race, color, religion, gender, pregnancy, national
739 origin, age, handicap, immigration status, or marital status in
740 the areas of education, employment, or public accommodations
741 gives rise to a cause of action for all relief and damages
742 described in s. 760.11(5), unless greater damages are expressly
743 provided for. If the statute prohibiting unlawful discrimination
744 provides an administrative remedy, the action for equitable
745 relief and damages provided for in this section may be initiated
746 only after the plaintiff has exhausted his or her administrative
747 remedy. The term "public accommodations" does not include lodge
748 halls or other similar facilities of private organizations which
749 are made available for public use occasionally or periodically.
750 The right to trial by jury is preserved in any case in which the
Page 30 of 88
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb315-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 315 2026
751 plaintiff is seeking actual or punitive damages.
752 Section 16. Section 760.08, Florida Statutes, is amended
753 to read:
754 760.08 Discrimination in places of public accommodation.—
755 All persons are entitled to the full and equal enjoyment of the
756 goods, services, facilities, privileges, advantages, and
757 accommodations of any place of public accommodation without
758 discrimination or segregation on the ground of race, color,
759 national origin, sex, pregnancy, handicap, familial status,
760 immigration status, or religion.
761 Section 17. Subsections (1) and (2), paragraphs (a) and
762 (b) of subsection (3), subsections (4), (5), and (6), and
763 paragraph (a) of subsection (9) of section 760.10, Florida
764 Statutes, are amended to read:
765 760.10 Unlawful employment practices.—
766 (1) It is an unlawful employment practice for an employer:
767 (a) To discharge or to fail or refuse to hire any
768 individual, or otherwise to discriminate against any individual
769 with respect to compensation, terms, conditions, or privileges
770 of employment, because of such individual's race, color,
771 religion, sex, pregnancy, national origin, age, handicap,
772 immigration status, or marital status.
773 (b) To limit, segregate, or classify employees or
774 applicants for employment in any way which would deprive or tend
775 to deprive any individual of employment opportunities, or
Page 31 of 88
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb315-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 315 2026
776 adversely affect any individual's status as an employee, because
777 of such individual's race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy,
778 national origin, age, handicap, immigration status, or marital
779 status.
780 (2) It is an unlawful employment practice for an
781 employment agency to fail or refuse to refer for employment, or
782 otherwise to discriminate against, any individual because of
783 race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, national origin, age,
784 handicap, immigration status, or marital status or to classify
785 or refer for employment any individual on the basis of race,
786 color, religion, sex, pregnancy, national origin, age, handicap,
787 immigration status, or marital status.
788 (3) It is an unlawful employment practice for a labor
789 organization:
790 (a) To exclude or to expel from its membership, or
791 otherwise to discriminate against, any individual because of
792 race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, national origin, age,
793 handicap, immigration status, or marital status.
794 (b) To limit, segregate, or classify its membership or
795 applicants for membership, or to classify or fail or refuse to
796 refer for employment any individual, in any way that would
797 deprive or tend to deprive any individual of employment
798 opportunities, or adversely affect any individual's status as an
799 employee or as an applicant for employment, because of such
800 individual's race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, national
Page 32 of 88
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb315-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 315 2026
801 origin, age, handicap, immigration status, or marital status.
802 (4) It is an unlawful employment practice for any
803 employer, labor organization, or joint labor-management
804 committee controlling apprenticeship or other training or
805 retraining, including on-the-job training programs, to
806 discriminate against any individual because of race, color,
807 religion, sex, pregnancy, national origin, age, handicap,
808 immigration status, or marital status in admission to, or
809 employment in, any program established to provide apprenticeship
810 or other training.
811 (5) Whenever, in order to engage in a profession,
812 occupation, or trade, it is required that a person receive a
813 license, certification, or other credential, become a member or
814 an associate of any club, association, or other organization, or
815 pass any examination, it is an unlawful employment practice for
816 any person to discriminate against any other person seeking such
817 license, certification, or other credential, seeking to become a
818 member or associate of such club, association, or other
819 organization, or seeking to take or pass such examination,
820 because of such other person's race, color, religion, sex,
821 pregnancy, national origin, age, handicap, immigration status,
822 or marital status.
823 (6) It is an unlawful employment practice for an employer,
824 labor organization, employment agency, or joint labor-management
825 committee to print, or cause to be printed or published, any
Page 33 of 88
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb315-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 315 2026
826 notice or advertisement relating to employment, membership,
827 classification, referral for employment, or apprenticeship or
828 other training, indicating any preference, limitation,
829 specification, or discrimination, based on race, color,
830 religion, sex, pregnancy, national origin, age, absence of
831 handicap, immigration status, or marital status.
832 (9) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section,
833 it is not an unlawful employment practice under ss. 760.01-
834 760.10 for an employer, employment agency, labor organization,
835 or joint labor-management committee to:
836 (a) Take or fail to take any action on the basis of
837 religion, sex, pregnancy, national origin, age, handicap,
838 immigration status, or marital status in those certain instances
839 in which religion, sex, condition of pregnancy, national origin,
840 age, absence of a particular handicap, immigration status, or
841 marital status is a bona fide occupational qualification
842 reasonably necessary for the performance of the particular
843 employment to which such action or inaction is related.
844 Section 18. Subsections (1) through (5) of section 760.23,
845 Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
846 760.23 Discrimination in the sale or rental of housing and
847 other prohibited practices.—
848 (1) It is unlawful to refuse to sell or rent after the
849 making of a bona fide offer, to refuse to negotiate for the sale
850 or rental of, or otherwise to make unavailable or deny a
Page 34 of 88
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb315-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 315 2026
851 dwelling to any person because of race, color, national origin,
852 sex, disability, familial status, immigration status, or
853 religion.
854 (2) It is unlawful to discriminate against any person in
855 the terms, conditions, or privileges of sale or rental of a
856 dwelling, or in the provision of services or facilities in
857 connection therewith, because of race, color, national origin,
858 sex, disability, familial status, immigration status, or
859 religion.
860 (3) It is unlawful to make, print, or publish, or cause to
861 be made, printed, or published, any notice, statement, or
862 advertisement with respect to the sale or rental of a dwelling
863 that indicates any preference, limitation, or discrimination
864 based on race, color, national origin, sex, disability, familial
865 status, immigration status, or religion or an intention to make
866 any such preference, limitation, or discrimination.
867 (4) It is unlawful to represent to any person because of
868 race, color, national origin, sex, disability, familial status,
869 immigration status, or religion that any dwelling is not
870 available for inspection, sale, or rental when such dwelling is
871 in fact so available.
872 (5) It is unlawful, for profit, to induce or attempt to
873 induce any person to sell or rent any dwelling by a
874 representation regarding the entry or prospective entry into the
875 neighborhood of a person or persons of a particular race, color,
Page 35 of 88
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb315-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 315 2026
876 national origin, sex, disability, familial status, immigration
877 status, or religion.
878 Section 19. Section 760.24, Florida Statutes, is amended
879 to read:
880 760.24 Discrimination in the provision of brokerage
881 services.—It is unlawful to deny any person access to, or
882 membership or participation in, any multiple-listing service,
883 real estate brokers' organization, or other service,
884 organization, or facility relating to the business of selling or
885 renting dwellings, or to discriminate against him or her in the
886 terms or conditions of such access, membership, or
887 participation, on account of race, color, national origin, sex,
888 disability, familial status, immigration status, or religion.
889 Section 20. Subsection (1) and paragraph (a) of subsection
890 (2) of section 760.25, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
891 760.25 Discrimination in the financing of housing or in
892 residential real estate transactions.—
893 (1) It is unlawful for any bank, building and loan
894 association, insurance company, or other corporation,
895 association, firm, or enterprise the business of which consists
896 in whole or in part of the making of commercial real estate
897 loans to deny a loan or other financial assistance to a person
898 applying for the loan for the purpose of purchasing,
899 constructing, improving, repairing, or maintaining a dwelling,
900 or to discriminate against him or her in the fixing of the
Page 36 of 88
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb315-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 315 2026
901 amount, interest rate, duration, or other term or condition of
902 such loan or other financial assistance, because of the race,
903 color, national origin, sex, disability, familial status,
904 immigration status, or religion of such person or of any person
905 associated with him or her in connection with such loan or other
906 financial assistance or the purposes of such loan or other
907 financial assistance, or because of the race, color, national
908 origin, sex, disability, familial status, immigration status, or
909 religion of the present or prospective owners, lessees, tenants,
910 or occupants of the dwelling or dwellings in relation to which
911 such loan or other financial assistance is to be made or given.
912 (2)(a) It is unlawful for any person or entity whose
913 business includes engaging in residential real estate
914 transactions to discriminate against any person in making
915 available such a transaction, or in the terms or conditions of
916 such a transaction, because of race, color, national origin,
917 sex, disability, familial status, immigration status, or
918 religion.
919 Section 21. Section 760.26, Florida Statutes, is amended
920 to read:
921 760.26 Prohibited discrimination in land use decisions and
922 in permitting of development.—It is unlawful to discriminate in
923 land use decisions or in the permitting of development based on
924 race, color, national origin, sex, disability, familial status,
925 immigration status, religion, or, except as otherwise provided
Page 37 of 88
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb315-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 315 2026
926 by law, the source of financing of a development or proposed
927 development.
928 Section 22. Subsection (2) and paragraph (a) of subsection
929 (5) of section 760.29, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
930 760.29 Exemptions.—
931 (2) Nothing in ss. 760.20-760.37 prohibits a religious
932 organization, association, or society, or any nonprofit
933 institution or organization operated, supervised, or controlled
934 by or in conjunction with a religious organization, association,
935 or society, from limiting the sale, rental, or occupancy of any
936 dwelling which it owns or operates for other than a commercial
937 purpose to persons of the same religion or from giving
938 preference to such persons, unless membership in such religion
939 is restricted on account of race, color, or national origin, or
940 immigration status. Nothing in ss. 760.20-760.37 prohibits a
941 private club not in fact open to the public, which as an
942 incident to its primary purpose or purposes provides lodgings
943 which it owns or operates for other than a commercial purpose,
944 from limiting the rental or occupancy of such lodgings to its
945 members or from giving preference to its members.
946 (5) Nothing in ss. 760.20-760.37:
947 (a) Prohibits a person engaged in the business of
948 furnishing appraisals of real property from taking into
949 consideration factors other than race, color, national origin,
950 sex, disability, familial status, immigration status, or
Page 38 of 88
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb315-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 315 2026
951 religion.
952 Section 23. Section 760.45, Florida Statutes, is created
953 to read:
954 760.45 Discrimination on the basis of certain driver
955 licenses prohibited.—
956 (1) A person or an entity, including a business
957 establishment or an employer, may not discriminate against an
958 individual because the individual holds or presents a driver
959 license that does not comply with the REAL ID Act of 2005, Pub.
960 L. No. 109-13.
961 (2) An employer may not require an employee to present a
962 driver license unless possessing a driver license is required by
963 law or is lawfully required by the employer. This subsection may
964 not be construed to limit or expand an employer's authority to
965 require an employee to possess a driver license.
966 (3) This section may not be construed to do either of the
967 following:
968 (a) Alter an employer's rights or obligations under the
969 Immigration and Nationality Act, 8 U.S.C. s. 1324(a), regarding
970 obtaining documentation that evidences identity and
971 authorization for employment.
972 (b) Prohibit any other action taken by an employer which
973 is required under 8 U.S.C. s. 1324a(a).
974 (4) The state or a local government; an agent or a person
975 acting on behalf of the state or a local government; or a
Page 39 of 88
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb315-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 315 2026
976 program or activity that is funded directly by, or receives
977 financial assistance from, the state may not discriminate
978 against an individual because the individual holds or presents a
979 driver license that does not comply with the REAL ID Act of
980 2005, Pub. L. No. 109-13. This prohibition includes, but is not
981 limited to, notifying a law enforcement agency of the
982 individual's identity or that the individual holds a driver
983 license that does not comply with the REAL ID Act of 2005, Pub.
984 L. No. 109-13, if notification is not required by law or would
985 not have been provided if the individual's driver license had
986 been compliant with such act.
987 Section 24. Subsection (1) of section 760.60, Florida
988 Statutes, is amended to read:
989 760.60 Discriminatory practices of certain clubs
990 prohibited; remedies.—
991 (1) It is unlawful for a person to discriminate against
992 any individual because of race, color, religion, gender,
993 national origin, handicap, age above the age of 21, immigration
994 status, or marital status in evaluating an application for
995 membership in a club that has more than 400 members, that
996 provides regular meal service, and that regularly receives
997 payment for dues, fees, use of space, facilities, services,
998 meals, or beverages directly or indirectly from nonmembers for
999 business purposes. It is unlawful for a person, on behalf of
1000 such a club, to publish, circulate, issue, display, post, or
Page 40 of 88
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb315-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 315 2026
1001 mail any advertisement, notice, or solicitation that contains a
1002 statement to the effect that the accommodations, advantages,
1003 facilities, membership, or privileges of the club are denied to
1004 any individual because of race, color, religion, gender,
1005 national origin, handicap, age above the age of 21, immigration
1006 status, or marital status. This subsection does not apply to
1007 fraternal or benevolent organizations, ethnic clubs, or
1008 religious organizations where business activity is not
1009 prevalent.
1010 Section 25. Section 775.0848, Florida Statutes, is amended
1011 to read:
1012 775.0848 Commission of a felony after unlawful reentry
1013 into the United States Offenses committed by an unauthorized
1014 alien; reclassification.—A person who has been previously
1015 convicted of a crime relating to the reentry of removed aliens
1016 under 8 U.S.C. s. 1326 shall have the penalty for committing a
1017 any misdemeanor or felony after such conviction committed by an
1018 unauthorized alien as defined in s. 908.111 shall be
1019 reclassified in the following manner:
1020 (1) A misdemeanor of the second degree is reclassified to
1021 a misdemeanor of the first degree.
1022 (2) A misdemeanor of the first degree is reclassified to a
1023 felony of the third degree.
1024 (1)(3) A felony of the third degree is reclassified to a
1025 felony of the second degree.
Page 41 of 88
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb315-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 315 2026
1026 (2)(4) A felony of the second degree is reclassified to a
1027 felony of the first degree.
1028 (3)(5) A felony of the first degree is reclassified to a
1029 life felony.
1030 Section 26. Section 787.07, Florida Statutes, is repealed.
1031 Section 27. Subsection (6) of section 908.102, Florida
1032 Statutes, is amended to read:
1033 908.102 Definitions.—As used in this chapter, the term:
1034 (6) "Sanctuary policy" means a law, policy, practice,
1035 procedure, or custom adopted or allowed by a state entity or
1036 local governmental entity which prohibits or impedes a law
1037 enforcement agency from complying with 8 U.S.C. s. 1373 or which
1038 prohibits or impedes a law enforcement agency from communicating
1039 or cooperating with a federal immigration agency so as to limit
1040 such law enforcement agency in, or prohibit the agency from:
1041 (a) Complying with an immigration detainer;
1042 (b) Complying with a request from a federal immigration
1043 agency to notify the agency before the release of an inmate or
1044 detainee in the custody of the law enforcement agency;
1045 (c) Providing a federal immigration agency access to an
1046 inmate for interview;
1047 (d) Participating in any program or agreement authorized
1048 under s. 287 of the Immigration and Nationality Act, 8 U.S.C. s.
1049 1357 as required by s. 908.11;
1050 (e) Providing a federal immigration agency with an
Page 42 of 88
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb315-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 315 2026
1051 inmate's incarceration status or release date;
1052 (f) Providing information to a state entity on the
1053 immigration status of an inmate or detainee in the custody of
1054 the law enforcement agency;
1055 (g) Executing a lawful judicial warrant; or
1056 (h) Participating in a federal immigration operation with
1057 a federal immigration agency as permitted by federal and state
1058 law.
1059 Section 28. Sections 908.103, 908.105, and 908.106,
1060 Florida Statutes, are repealed.
1061 Section 29. Paragraph (h) is added to subsection (3) of
1062 section 908.1031, Florida Statutes, to read:
1063 908.1031 State Board of Immigration Enforcement; creation;
1064 purpose and duties.—
1065 (3) The board is the chief immigration enforcement officer
1066 of the state and shall:
1067 (h) Investigate any complaints received for violations of
1068 and otherwise enforce the Visible Identification Standards for
1069 Immigration-Based Law Enforcement Act pursuant to s. 908.14.
1070 Section 30. Paragraph (i) is added to subsection (4) of
1071 section 908.1032, Florida Statutes, to read:
1072 908.1032 State Immigration Enforcement Council.—The State
1073 Immigration Enforcement Council, an advisory council as defined
1074 in s. 20.03, is created within the State Board of Immigration
1075 Enforcement for the purpose of advising the board.
Page 43 of 88
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb315-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 315 2026
1076 (4) The council shall:
1077 (i) Collect data relating to the Visible Identification
1078 Standards for Immigration-Based Law Enforcement Act and, by June
1079 30 of each year, submit to the President of the Senate and the
1080 Speaker of the House of Representatives a report in accordance
1081 with s. 908.14.
1082 Section 31. Section 908.104, Florida Statutes, is amended
1083 to read:
1084 908.104 Cooperation with federal immigration authorities.—
1085 To ensure compliance with Title VII of the Civil Rights Act of
1086 1964,
1087 (1) Consistent with all duties created in state and
1088 federal law, state and local law enforcement agencies and any
1089 official responsible for directing or supervising such agency
1090 shall use best efforts to support the enforcement of federal
1091 immigration law. This subsection applies to an official,
1092 representative, agent, or employee of the entity or agency only
1093 when he or she is acting within the scope of his or her official
1094 duties or within the scope of his or her employment.
1095 (2) Except as otherwise expressly prohibited by federal
1096 law, a state entity, local governmental entity, or law
1097 enforcement agency, or an employee, an agent, or a
1098 representative of the entity or agency, may not prohibit or in
1099 any way restrict a law enforcement agency from taking any of the
1100 following actions with respect to information regarding a
Page 44 of 88
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb315-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 315 2026
1101 person's immigration status:
1102 (a) Sending the information to or requesting, receiving,
1103 or reviewing the information from a federal immigration agency
1104 for purposes of this chapter.
1105 (b) Recording and maintaining the information for purposes
1106 of this chapter.
1107 (c) Exchanging the information with a federal immigration
1108 agency or another state entity, local governmental entity, or
1109 law enforcement agency for purposes of this chapter.
1110 (d) Using the information to comply with an immigration
1111 detainer.
1112 (e) Using the information to confirm the identity of a
1113 person who is detained by a law enforcement agency.
1114 (f) Sending the applicable information obtained pursuant
1115 to enforcement of s. 448.095 to a federal immigration agency.
1116 (3) A state entity, local governmental entity, or law
1117 enforcement agency may not prohibit or in any way restrict a law
1118 enforcement officer from executing or assisting in the execution
1119 of a lawful judicial warrant.
1120 (4)(a) For purposes of this subsection, the term
1121 "applicable criminal case" means a criminal case in which:
1122 1. The judgment requires the defendant to be confined in a
1123 secure correctional facility; and
1124 2. The judge:
1125 a. Indicates in the record under s. 908.105 that the
Page 45 of 88
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb315-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 315 2026
1126 defendant is subject to an immigration detainer; or
1127 b. Otherwise indicates in the record that the defendant is
1128 subject to a transfer into federal custody.
1129 (b) In an applicable criminal case, when the judge
1130 sentences a defendant who is the subject of an immigration
1131 detainer to confinement, the judge shall issue an order
1132 requiring the secure correctional facility in which the
1133 defendant is to be confined to reduce the defendant's sentence
1134 by a period of not more than 12 days on the facility's
1135 determination that the reduction in sentence will facilitate the
1136 seamless transfer of the defendant into federal custody. For
1137 purposes of this paragraph, the term "secure correctional
1138 facility" means a state correctional institution as defined in
1139 s. 944.02 or a county detention facility or a municipal
1140 detention facility as defined in s. 951.23.
1141 (c) If the information specified in sub-subparagraph
1142 (a)2.a. or sub-subparagraph (a)2.b. is not available at the time
1143 the sentence is pronounced in the case, but is received by a law
1144 enforcement agency afterwards, the law enforcement agency shall
1145 notify the judge who shall issue the order described by
1146 paragraph (b) as soon as the information becomes available.
1147 (5) when a county correctional facility or the Department
1148 of Corrections receives verification from a federal immigration
1149 agency that a person subject to an immigration detainer is in
1150 the law enforcement agency's custody, the agency must facilitate
Page 46 of 88
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb315-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 315 2026
1151 a screening of the person by a public defender to determine if
1152 the person is or has been a necessary witness or victim of a
1153 crime of domestic violence, rape, sexual exploitation, sexual
1154 assault, murder, manslaughter, assault, battery, human
1155 trafficking, kidnapping, false imprisonment, involuntary
1156 servitude, fraud in foreign labor contracting, blackmail,
1157 extortion, or witness tampering. The screening must be in the
1158 preferred language of the person being detained. If the public
1159 defender determines that the person is a necessary witness or
1160 victim of the aforementioned acts, the county correctional
1161 facility or the Department of Corrections may decline to comply
1162 with the federal immigration detainer. Otherwise, the county
1163 correctional facility or the Department of Corrections may
1164 securely transport the person to a federal facility in this
1165 state or to another point of transfer to federal custody outside
1166 the jurisdiction of the law enforcement agency. The law
1167 enforcement agency may transfer a person who is subject to an
1168 immigration detainer and is confined in a secure correctional
1169 facility to the custody of a federal immigration agency not
1170 earlier than 12 days before his or her release date. A law
1171 enforcement agency shall obtain judicial authorization before
1172 securely transporting an alien to a point of transfer outside of
1173 this state.
1174 (6) Upon request from a federal immigration agency, a
1175 sheriff or chief correctional officer operating a county
Page 47 of 88
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb315-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 315 2026
1176 detention facility must provide the requesting federal
1177 immigration agency a list of all inmates booked into a county
1178 detention facility and any information regarding each inmate's
1179 immigration status.
1180 (7) This section does not require a state entity, local
1181 governmental entity, or law enforcement agency to provide a
1182 federal immigration agency with information related to a victim
1183 of or a witness to a criminal offense if:
1184 (a) The victim or witness is necessary to the
1185 investigation or prosecution of a crime, and such crime occurred
1186 in the United States; and
1187 (b) The victim or witness timely and in good faith
1188 responds to the entity's or agency's request for information and
1189 cooperates in the investigation or prosecution of such offense.
1190 (8) A state entity, local governmental entity, or law
1191 enforcement agency that, pursuant to subsection (7), withholds
1192 information regarding the immigration information of a victim of
1193 or witness to a criminal offense shall document the victim's or
1194 witness's cooperation in the entity's or agency's investigative
1195 records related to the offense and shall retain the records for
1196 at least 10 years for the purpose of audit, verification, or
1197 inspection by the Auditor General.
1198 (9) This section does not authorize a law enforcement
1199 agency to detain an alien unlawfully present in the United
1200 States pursuant to an immigration detainer solely because the
Page 48 of 88
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb315-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 315 2026
1201 alien witnessed or reported a crime or was a victim of a
1202 criminal offense.
1203 (10) This section does not apply to any alien unlawfully
1204 present in the United States if he or she is or has been a
1205 necessary witness or victim of a crime of domestic violence,
1206 rape, sexual exploitation, sexual assault, murder, manslaughter,
1207 assault, battery, human trafficking, kidnapping, false
1208 imprisonment, involuntary servitude, fraud in foreign labor
1209 contracting, blackmail, extortion, or witness tampering,
1210 provided that such crime was committed in the United States.
1211 Documentation, including, but not limited to, police reports,
1212 testimony, sworn statements, or a victim impact statement, must
1213 be relied upon to verify that the person was a necessary witness
1214 or victim to the crime.
1215 Section 32. Section 908.1041, Florida Statutes, is created
1216 to read:
1217 908.1041 Prohibition against engaging in immigration
1218 enforcement activities near public and private schools, child
1219 care facilities, or religious institutions.—
1220 (1) As used in this section, the term:
1221 (a) "Child care facility" has the same meaning as in s.
1222 402.302.
1223 (b) "Immigration enforcement activities" means any action
1224 by a law enforcement officer or agency, including, but not
1225 limited to, the identification, detention, questioning,
Page 49 of 88
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb315-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 315 2026
1226 investigation, or arrest of individuals based on their
1227 immigration status.
1228 (c) "Private school" has the same meaning as in s.
1229 1002.01.
1230 (d) "Public school" means any facility or location
1231 providing primary or secondary education, including, but not
1232 limited to, public K-12 schools, charter schools, and school
1233 grounds.
1234 (e) "Religious institution" means any building or space
1235 primarily used for religious worship or practices, including,
1236 but not limited to, a church, synagogue, mosque, temple, and
1237 other place of religious gathering.
1238 (2) A law enforcement agency, law enforcement officer,
1239 sheriff's deputy, or federal immigration agency may not engage
1240 in or cooperate with immigration enforcement activities or
1241 engage in or cooperate with immigration enforcement activities
1242 pursuant to the Unauthorized Alien Transport Program under s.
1243 908.13 within 500 feet of any public or private school, child
1244 care facility, or religious institution, except in cases of
1245 exigent circumstances when immediate action is necessary to
1246 prevent harm or death. A local law enforcement agency, law
1247 enforcement officer, sheriff's deputy, or federal immigration
1248 agency may not:
1249 (a) Use agency resources, personnel, or authority to
1250 question, detain, or arrest individuals solely based on their
Page 50 of 88
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb315-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 315 2026
1251 immigration status on the grounds of, or within 500 feet of, a
1252 public or private school, child care facility, or religious
1253 institution.
1254 (b) Collaborate with federal immigration agency
1255 authorities for immigration enforcement purposes within or
1256 around the areas described in this subsection unless authorized
1257 to do so by a court with jurisdiction over the matter.
1258 (3) This section does not prohibit a local law enforcement
1259 agency, law enforcement officer, sheriff's deputy, or federal
1260 immigration agency from engaging in activities related to
1261 criminal investigations, emergency responses, or school safety
1262 as authorized by law, provided such activities do not involve
1263 immigration enforcement activities.
1264 (4) By August 1, 2026, each local law enforcement agency
1265 shall submit to the Department of Law Enforcement a report
1266 detailing policies and protocols for compliance with this
1267 section, including training protocols for officers.
1268 (5) A local law enforcement agency, law enforcement
1269 officer, or sheriff's deputy who violates this section may be
1270 subject to disciplinary action by the local governmental entity,
1271 including suspension, dismissal, or loss of funding for local
1272 enforcement efforts.
1273 Section 33. Subsections (3) and (4) of section 908.107,
1274 Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
1275 908.107 Enforcement.—
Page 51 of 88
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb315-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 315 2026
1276 (3) If a local governmental entity or local law
1277 enforcement agency violates this chapter, the court must enjoin
1278 the unlawful sanctuary policy. The court has continuing
1279 jurisdiction over the parties and subject matter and may enforce
1280 its orders with the initiation of contempt proceedings as
1281 provided by law.
1282 (4) An order approving a consent decree or granting an
1283 injunction must include written findings of fact that describe
1284 with specificity the existence and nature of the sanctuary
1285 policy that violates this chapter.
1286 Section 34. Section 908.11, Florida Statutes, is amended
1287 to read:
1288 908.11 Immigration enforcement assistance agreements;
1289 reporting requirement.—
1290 (1) Beginning January 1, 2027, the sheriff or the chief
1291 correctional officer operating a county detention facility may
1292 not must enter into or renew a written agreement with the United
1293 States Immigration and Customs Enforcement to participate in the
1294 immigration program established under s. 287(g) of the
1295 Immigration and Nationality Act, 8 U.S.C. s. 1357. The State
1296 Board of Immigration Enforcement must approve the termination of
1297 any such agreement. This subsection does not require a sheriff
1298 or chief correctional officer operating a county detention
1299 facility to participate in a particular program model.
1300 (2) Beginning no later than April 1, 2025, and until the
Page 52 of 88
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb315-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 315 2026
1301 sheriff or chief correctional officer operating a county
1302 detention facility that has such a enters into the written
1303 agreement required under subsection (1), each sheriff or chief
1304 correctional officer operating a county detention facility must
1305 notify the State Board of Immigration Enforcement quarterly of
1306 the status of any active or pending agreement.
1307 (3) The Department of Law Enforcement must establish a
1308 regular training schedule to educate relevant employees and
1309 other state entities that collaborate with federal agencies
1310 about current immigration enforcement policies and priorities
1311 such written agreement and any reason for noncompliance with
1312 this section, if applicable.
1313 Section 35. Section 908.14, Florida Statutes, is created
1314 to read:
1315 908.14 Visible Identification Standards for Immigration-
1316 Based Law Enforcement Act.—
1317 (1) This act may be cited as the "VISIBLE Act."
1318 (2) As used in this section, the term:
1319 (a) "Covered immigration officer" means a person who is
1320 authorized to perform immigration enforcement functions and who
1321 is:
1322 1. An officer or employee of a law enforcement agency;
1323 2. An officer or employee of United States Customs and
1324 Border Protection;
1325 3. An officer or employee of United States Immigration and
Page 53 of 88
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb315-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 315 2026
1326 Customs Enforcement; or
1327 4. A person authorized, deputized, or designated under
1328 federal law, regulation, or agreement to perform immigration
1329 enforcement functions.
1330 (b) "Public immigration enforcement function" means any
1331 activity that involves the direct exercise of federal
1332 immigration authority through public-facing actions, including a
1333 patrol, a stop, an arrest, a search, an interview to determine
1334 immigration status, a raid, a checkpoint inspection, or the
1335 service of a judicial or administrative warrant. The term does
1336 not include covert, nonpublic operations or nonenforcement
1337 activities.
1338 (c) "Visible identification" means the display of the name
1339 or widely recognized initials of the employing agency of a
1340 covered immigration officer and the officer's last name or badge
1341 or identification number in a size and format that complies with
1342 the requirements in subsection (4).
1343 (3) A covered immigration officer who directly engages in
1344 a public immigration enforcement function within this state must
1345 wear visible identification at all times during such engagement.
1346 (4) The visible identification must:
1347 (a) For the employing agency of the covered immigration
1348 officer, be displayed in a size and format that is clearly
1349 legible from a distance of not less than 25 feet, using
1350 materials or markings suitable for visibility in both daylight
Page 54 of 88
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb315-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 315 2026
1351 and low-light conditions under normal operational conditions.
1352 (b) For the covered immigration officer's last name or
1353 badge or identification number, be displayed in a manner that is
1354 clearly visible and readable during direct engagement with the
1355 public.
1356 (c) Be displayed on the covered immigration officer's
1357 outermost garment or gear and may not be obscured by tactical
1358 equipment, body armor, or accessories.
1359 (5) A covered immigration officer may not wear nonmedical
1360 face coverings, including masks or balaclavas, which impair the
1361 visibility of the identifying information required under this
1362 section or obscure the officer's face unless such face covering
1363 is necessary to protect the integrity of a covert, nonpublic
1364 operation or to guard against hazardous environmental
1365 conditions.
1366 (6) The State Board of Immigration Enforcement shall do
1367 all of the following:
1368 (a) Receive and investigate complaints from the public
1369 concerning violations of this section.
1370 (b) Ensure that a covered immigration officer who fails to
1371 comply with the requirements of this section receives
1372 appropriate disciplinary action, including a written reprimand,
1373 suspension, or other personnel action, consistent with the
1374 policies of the officer's employing agency and any applicable
1375 collective bargaining agreement.
Page 55 of 88
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb315-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 315 2026
1376 (c) Make recommendations to the Legislature concerning
1377 compliance with this section and corrective actions that should
1378 be taken.
1379 (d) Carry out its responsibilities under this section in
1380 accordance with its statutory authority.
1381 (7) By June 30, 2027, and annually thereafter, the State
1382 Immigration Enforcement Council shall submit to the President of
1383 the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives a
1384 report that includes all of the following information:
1385 (a) The total number of public immigration enforcement
1386 functions conducted during the reporting period.
1387 (b) The number of documented instances of noncompliance
1388 with this section.
1389 (c) A summary of disciplinary or remedial actions taken
1390 against any covered immigration officer who did not comply with
1391 this section.
1392 Section 36. Section 921.1426, Florida Statutes, is
1393 repealed.
1394 Section 37. Section 943.1718, Florida Statutes, is amended
1395 to read:
1396 943.1718 Body cameras and face coverings; policies and
1397 procedures; penalties.—
1398 (1) DEFINITIONS.—As used in this section, the term:
1399 (a) "Body camera" means a portable electronic recording
1400 device that is worn on a law enforcement officer's person that
Page 56 of 88
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb315-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 315 2026
1401 records audio and video data of the officer's law-enforcement-
1402 related encounters and activities.
1403 (b)1. "Face covering" means any opaque mask, garment,
1404 helmet, or other item, including, but not limited to, a
1405 balaclava, tactical mask, gator, ski mask, or any other similar
1406 type of facial covering or face-shielding item, which conceals
1407 or obscures the face of a person.
1408 2. The term does not include any of the following:
1409 a. A translucent face shield or clear mask that does not
1410 conceal the wearer's face.
1411 b. A medical mask or surgical mask used to protect against
1412 the transmission of disease or infection.
1413 c. Any other mask or device, including, but not limited
1414 to, air-purifying respirators, full or half masks, or self-
1415 contained breathing apparatuses necessary to protect against
1416 exposure to a toxin, gas, smoke, or any other hazardous
1417 environmental condition.
1418 (c)(b) "Law enforcement agency" means an agency that has a
1419 primary mission of preventing and detecting crime and enforcing
1420 the penal, criminal, traffic, and motor vehicle laws of the
1421 state and in furtherance of that primary mission employs law
1422 enforcement officers as defined in s. 943.10.
1423 (d)(c) "Law enforcement officer" has the same meaning as
1424 provided in s. 943.10.
1425 (e) "Undercover investigation" means a planned act
Page 57 of 88
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb315-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 315 2026
1426 authorized by a law enforcement agency or a court order which
1427 uses an undercover operative to intentionally interact with a
1428 suspect or others or to obtain evidence of criminal activity.
1429 (f) "Undercover operative" means a law enforcement officer
1430 or a full-time sworn officer in this state or another state or
1431 the Federal Government using an assumed name or cover identity
1432 to interact with persons or entities to collect evidence of
1433 criminal activity.
1434 (2) BODY CAMERAS.—
1435 (a) A law enforcement agency that permits its law
1436 enforcement officers to wear body cameras shall establish
1437 policies and procedures addressing the proper use, maintenance,
1438 and storage of body cameras and the data recorded by body
1439 cameras. The policies and procedures must include:
1440 1.(a) General guidelines for the proper use, maintenance,
1441 and storage of body cameras.
1442 2.(b) Any limitations on which law enforcement officers
1443 are permitted to wear body cameras.
1444 3.(c) Any limitations on law-enforcement-related
1445 encounters and activities in which law enforcement officers are
1446 permitted to wear body cameras.
1447 4.(d) A provision permitting a law enforcement officer
1448 using a body camera to review the recorded footage from the body
1449 camera, upon his or her own initiative or request, before
1450 writing a report or providing a statement regarding any event
Page 58 of 88
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb315-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 315 2026
1451 arising within the scope of his or her official duties. Any such
1452 provision may not apply to an officer's inherent duty to
1453 immediately disclose information necessary to secure an active
1454 crime scene or to identify suspects or witnesses.
1455 5.(e) General guidelines for the proper storage,
1456 retention, and release of audio and video data recorded by body
1457 cameras.
1458 (b)(3) A law enforcement agency that permits its law
1459 enforcement officers to wear body cameras shall:
1460 1.(a) Ensure that all personnel who wear, use, maintain,
1461 or store body cameras are trained in the law enforcement
1462 agency's policies and procedures concerning them.
1463 2.(b) Ensure that all personnel who use, maintain, store,
1464 or release audio or video data recorded by body cameras are
1465 trained in the law enforcement agency's policies and procedures.
1466 3.(c) Retain audio and video data recorded by body cameras
1467 in accordance with the requirements of s. 119.021, except as
1468 otherwise provided by law.
1469 4.(d) Perform a periodic review of actual agency body
1470 camera practices to ensure conformity with the agency's policies
1471 and procedures.
1472 (c)(4) Chapter 934 does not apply to body camera
1473 recordings made by law enforcement agencies that elect to use
1474 body cameras.
1475 (3) FACE COVERINGS.—
Page 59 of 88
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb315-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 315 2026
1476 (a) A law enforcement officer may not wear a face covering
1477 in the performance of his or her official duties.
1478 (b) Before undertaking an undercover investigation that is
1479 reasonably likely to involve a law enforcement officer wearing a
1480 face covering in the performance of his or her official duties,
1481 a law enforcement agency must provide advance notice to the
1482 sheriff with jurisdiction over the location in which the
1483 undercover investigation takes place. Such notice must be given
1484 at least 12 hours before the undercover investigation begins and
1485 must include when and where the law enforcement officer will be
1486 operating, his or her planned actions, and the approximate time
1487 and duration of the undercover investigation.
1488 (c) Paragraph (a) does not apply to:
1489 1. A law enforcement officer performing his or her duties
1490 as an undercover operative during an active undercover
1491 investigation;
1492 2. Protective gear used by a Special Weapons and Tactics
1493 (SWAT) team officer which is necessary to protect his or her
1494 face from harm while performing SWAT team duties and
1495 responsibilities; or
1496 3. Exigent circumstances that involve an immediate danger
1497 or threat to persons or property or the escape of a perpetrator.
1498 (d) A first violation of this subsection is an infraction.
1499 A second or subsequent violation of this subsection is a
1500 misdemeanor of the second degree, punishable as provided in s.
Page 60 of 88
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb315-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 315 2026
1501 775.082 or s. 775.083.
1502 (e) On or before October 1, 2026, the Department of Law
1503 Enforcement shall adopt rules regulating the use of face
1504 coverings to comply with this subsection.
1505 Section 38. Paragraphs (b) and (c) of subsection (3) of
1506 section 943.325, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as
1507 paragraphs (c) and (d), respectively, and paragraph (a) of
1508 subsection (3) and paragraphs (b) and (f) of subsection (7) of
1509 that section are amended, to read:
1510 943.325 DNA database.—
1511 (3) COLLECTION OF SAMPLES.—
1512 (a) Each qualifying offender must shall submit a DNA
1513 sample at the time he or she is booked into a jail, correctional
1514 facility, or juvenile facility.
1515 (b) A person who becomes a qualifying offender solely
1516 because of the issuance of an immigration detainer by a federal
1517 immigration agency may must submit a DNA sample when the law
1518 enforcement agency having custody of the offender receives the
1519 detainer. A law enforcement agency may not forcibly extract a
1520 DNA sample from such person and the person may not be charged
1521 with a criminal offense solely for refusing to submit a DNA
1522 sample.
1523 (7) COLLECTION OF DNA SAMPLES FROM OFFENDERS.—
1524 (b) Arrested qualifying offenders must submit a DNA sample
1525 at the time they are booked into a jail, correctional facility,
Page 61 of 88
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb315-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 315 2026
1526 or juvenile facility, except as provided in paragraph (3)(b).
1527 (f) A law enforcement agency having custody of a person
1528 who becomes a qualifying offender solely because of the issuance
1529 of an immigration detainer by a federal immigration agency shall
1530 ensure that a DNA sample is taken from the offender immediately
1531 after the agency receives the detainer and shall secure and
1532 transmit the sample to the department in a timely manner.
1533 Section 39. Subsection (9) of section 1000.05, Florida
1534 Statutes, is renumbered as subsection (10), and a new subsection
1535 (9) is added to that section, to read:
1536 1000.05 Discrimination against students and employees in
1537 the Florida K-20 public education system prohibited; equality of
1538 access required.—
1539 (10)(a) As used in this subsection, the term:
1540 1. "Citizenship or immigration status" means any matter
1541 regarding citizenship of the United States or any other country
1542 or the authority or lack thereof to reside in or otherwise to be
1543 present in the United States, including a person's nationality
1544 and country of citizenship.
1545 2. "Law enforcement agent" means an agent of federal,
1546 state, or local law enforcement who has the power to arrest or
1547 detain a person or manage the custody of a detained person for a
1548 law enforcement purpose, including civil immigration
1549 enforcement. The term does not include a safe-school officer
1550 under s. 1006.12.
Page 62 of 88
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb315-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 315 2026
1551 3. "Nonjudicial warrant" means a warrant issued by a
1552 federal, state, or local agency with the power to arrest or
1553 detain a person for any law enforcement purpose, including civil
1554 immigration enforcement. The term includes an immigration
1555 detainer as defined in s. 908.102. The term does not include a
1556 criminal warrant issued upon a judicial determination of
1557 probable cause in compliance with the requirements of the Fourth
1558 Amendment to the United States Constitution or s. 12, Art. I of
1559 the State Constitution.
1560 4. "Prevailing party" means a party:
1561 a. Who obtains some of his or her requested relief through
1562 a judicial judgment in his or her favor;
1563 b. Who obtains some of his or her requested relief through
1564 a settlement agreement approved by the court; or
1565 c. Whose pursuit of a nonfrivolous claim was a catalyst
1566 for a unilateral change in position by the opposing party
1567 relative to the relief sought.
1568 5. "School" means a public school, school district, and
1569 governing body, including a charter school, and agents thereof,
1570 including a contracted party.
1571 (b) A child in this state may not be denied a free public
1572 education through secondary school based on the perceived or
1573 actual immigration status of the child or perceived or actual
1574 citizenship or immigration status of the child's parent or
1575 guardian.
Page 63 of 88
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb315-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 315 2026
1576 (c) A school may not:
1577 1. Exclude a child from participation in or deny a child
1578 the benefits of a program or an activity on the grounds of the
1579 perceived or actual immigration status of the child or the
1580 perceived or actual citizenship or immigration status of the
1581 child's parent or guardian.
1582 2. Use policies or procedures or engage in practices that
1583 have the effect of excluding a child from participation in or
1584 denying the benefits of a program or an activity or the effect
1585 of excluding participation of the child's parent or guardian
1586 from parental engagement activities or programs because of the
1587 perceived or actual immigration status of the child or the
1588 perceived or actual citizenship or immigration status of the
1589 child's parent or guardian. These policies, procedures, and
1590 practices include both of the following:
1591 a. Requesting or collecting information or documentation
1592 from a student or a student's parent or guardian about
1593 citizenship or immigration status unless required by state or
1594 federal law.
1595 b. Designating immigration status, citizenship, place of
1596 birth, nationality, or national origin as directory information
1597 as defined in 20 U.S.C. s. 1232g(a)(5).
1598 3. Threaten to disclose anything relating to the actual or
1599 perceived citizenship or immigration status of a child or the
1600 child's parent or guardian to any other person, entity,
Page 64 of 88
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb315-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 315 2026
1601 immigration agency, or law enforcement agency.
1602 4. Disclose anything relating to the perceived citizenship
1603 or immigration status of a child or the child's parent or
1604 guardian to any other person, entity, immigration agency, or law
1605 enforcement agency if the school does not have direct knowledge
1606 of the actual citizenship or immigration status of the child,
1607 parent, or guardian, subject to the requirements of this
1608 paragraph.
1609 5. Disclose anything relating to the actual citizenship or
1610 immigration status of a child or the child's parent or guardian
1611 to any other person or nongovernmental entity if the school has
1612 direct knowledge of the actual citizenship or immigration status
1613 of the child, parent, or guardian, subject to the requirements
1614 of this paragraph.
1615
1616 This paragraph does not authorize the disclosure of student
1617 records or information without complying with state and federal
1618 requirements governing the disclosure of such records or
1619 information. This paragraph does not prohibit or restrict an
1620 entity from sending to or receiving from the United States
1621 Department of Homeland Security or any other federal, state, or
1622 local governmental entity information regarding the citizenship
1623 or immigration status of a person under 8 U.S.C. ss. 1373 and
1624 1644.
1625 (d) By October 1, 2026, a school must develop procedures
Page 65 of 88
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb315-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 315 2026
1626 for reviewing and authorizing requests from a law enforcement
1627 agent attempting to enter a school or school facility. The
1628 procedures must comply with the requirements of this subsection
1629 and, at a minimum, include all of the following:
1630 1. Procedures for reviewing and contacting a designated
1631 authorized person at the school, school facility, district
1632 superintendent's office, or school administrative office who may
1633 contact the school's legal counsel.
1634 2. Procedures for the person authorized in subparagraph 1.
1635 or the school's legal counsel to review all of the following:
1636 a. Requests to enter a school or a school facility.
1637 b. Judicial warrants.
1638 c. Nonjudicial warrants.
1639 d. Subpoenas.
1640 3. Procedures for monitoring, accompanying, and
1641 documenting all interactions with a law enforcement agent while
1642 on school premises.
1643 4. Procedures for notifying and seeking consent from a
1644 student's parent or guardian, or from the student if the student
1645 is 18 years of age or older or emancipated, if a law enforcement
1646 agent requests access to a student for immigration enforcement
1647 purposes, unless a judicial warrant or subpoena restricts the
1648 disclosure of the information to the student's parent or
1649 guardian.
1650 (e)1. Beginning October 1, 2026, a party aggrieved by
Page 66 of 88
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb315-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 315 2026
1651 conduct that violates this subsection may file a civil action in
1652 a court of competent jurisdiction. The aggrieved party must file
1653 such action within 2 years after the violation occurred. If the
1654 court finds that a willful violation of paragraph (c) has
1655 occurred, the court may award actual damages. The court may
1656 grant any permanent or preliminary negative or mandatory
1657 injunction, temporary restraining order, or other order.
1658 2. Upon a motion, the court must award reasonable attorney
1659 fees and costs to a plaintiff who is a prevailing party in any
1660 action brought under this paragraph.
1661 3. This paragraph may not be construed to require a
1662 plaintiff to exhaust all administrative remedies before filing a
1663 civil action.
1664 (f) By October 1, 2026, a school must adopt policies for
1665 complying with this subsection.
1666 Section 40. Paragraph (c) of subsection (2) of section
1667 1002.31, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1668 1002.31 Controlled open enrollment; public school parental
1669 choice.—
1670 (2)
1671 (c) Each district school board must provide preferential
1672 treatment in its controlled open enrollment process to all of
1673 the following:
1674 1. Dependent children of active duty military personnel
1675 whose move resulted from military orders.
Page 67 of 88
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb315-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 315 2026
1676 2. Children who have been relocated due to a foster care
1677 placement in a different school zone.
1678 3. Children who move due to a court-ordered change in
1679 custody due to separation or divorce, or the serious illness or
1680 death of a custodial parent.
1681 4. Students residing in the school district.
1682 5. Children who are experiencing homelessness and children
1683 known to the department, as defined in s. 39.0016(1), regardless
1684 of their immigration status.
1685 Section 41. Paragraph (f) of subsection (1) of section
1686 1003.21, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1687 1003.21 School attendance.—
1688 (1)
1689 (f) Children and youths who are experiencing homelessness
1690 and children who are known to the department, as defined in s.
1691 39.0016(1), regardless of their immigration status s. 39.0016,
1692 must have access to a free public education and in accordance
1693 with s. 1002.31 must be admitted to the school of their parent's
1694 or guardian's choice, contingent on the school's capacity, in
1695 the school district in which they or their families or guardian
1696 live. School districts shall assist such children in meeting the
1697 requirements of subsection (4) and s. 1003.22, as well as local
1698 requirements for documentation.
1699 Section 42. Paragraphs (a), (b), and (c) of subsection
1700 (12) of section 1009.26, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
Page 68 of 88
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb315-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 315 2026
1701 1009.26 Fee waivers.—
1702 (12)(a) A state university, a Florida College System
1703 institution, a career center operated by a school district under
1704 s. 1001.44, or a charter technical career center shall waive
1705 out-of-state fees for undergraduate and graduate students who
1706 are citizens of the United States or lawfully present in the
1707 United States who meet the following conditions:
1708 1. Attended a secondary school in this state for 2 3
1709 consecutive years immediately before graduating from a high
1710 school in this state or received a high school equivalency
1711 diploma under s. 1003.435;
1712 2. Apply for enrollment in an institution of higher
1713 education within 24 months after high school or postsecondary
1714 graduation; and
1715 3. Submit an official Florida high school or postsecondary
1716 school transcript as evidence of attendance and graduation. In
1717 lieu of an official high school transcript, a student may submit
1718 a high school equivalency diploma under s. 1003.435.
1719 (b) Tuition and fees charged to a student who qualifies
1720 for the out-of-state fee waiver under this subsection may not
1721 exceed the tuition and fees charged to a resident student. The
1722 waiver is applicable for 110 percent of the required credit
1723 hours of the undergraduate or graduate degree or certificate
1724 program for which the student is enrolled. Each state
1725 university, Florida College System institution, career center
Page 69 of 88
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb315-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 315 2026
1726 operated by a school district under s. 1001.44, and charter
1727 technical career center shall report to the Board of Governors
1728 and the State Board of Education, respectively, the number and
1729 value of all fee waivers granted annually under this subsection.
1730 By October 1 of each year, the Board of Governors for the state
1731 universities and the State Board of Education for Florida
1732 College System institutions, career centers operated by a school
1733 district under s. 1001.44, and charter technical career centers
1734 shall annually report for the previous academic year the
1735 percentage of resident and nonresident students enrolled
1736 systemwide.
1737 (c) A state university student granted an out-of-state fee
1738 waiver under this subsection must be considered a nonresident
1739 student for purposes of calculating the systemwide total
1740 enrollment of nonresident students as limited by regulation of
1741 the Board of Governors. In addition, A student who is granted an
1742 out-of-state fee waiver under this subsection is not eligible
1743 for state financial aid under part III of this chapter and may
1744 must not be reported as a resident for tuition purposes.
1745 Section 43. Paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of section
1746 1009.40, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1747 1009.40 General requirements for student eligibility for
1748 state financial aid awards and tuition assistance grants.—
1749 (1)(a) The general requirements for eligibility of
1750 students for state financial aid awards and tuition assistance
Page 70 of 88
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb315-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 315 2026
1751 grants consist of the following:
1752 1. Achievement of the academic requirements of and
1753 acceptance at a state university or Florida College System
1754 institution; a nursing diploma school approved by the Florida
1755 Board of Nursing; a Florida college or university which is
1756 accredited by an accrediting agency recognized by the State
1757 Board of Education; a Florida institution the credits of which
1758 are acceptable for transfer to state universities; a career
1759 center; or a private career institution accredited by an
1760 accrediting agency recognized by the State Board of Education.
1761 2. Residency in this state for no less than 1 year
1762 preceding the award of aid or a tuition assistance grant for a
1763 program established pursuant to s. 1009.50, s. 1009.505, s.
1764 1009.51, s. 1009.52, s. 1009.521, s. 1009.53, s. 1009.60, s.
1765 1009.62, s. 1009.72, s. 1009.73, s. 1009.75, s. 1009.77, s.
1766 1009.89, or s. 1009.894. Residency in this state must be for
1767 purposes other than to obtain an education. Resident status for
1768 purposes of receiving state financial aid awards shall be
1769 determined in the same manner as resident status for tuition
1770 purposes pursuant to s. 1009.21. However, a student may not be
1771 denied classification as a resident for purposes of receiving
1772 state financial aid based solely on the student's immigration
1773 status if he or she has met the conditions for an out-of-state
1774 fee waiver under s. 1009.26(12)(a).
1775 3. Submission of certification attesting to the accuracy,
Page 71 of 88
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb315-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 315 2026
1776 completeness, and correctness of information provided to
1777 demonstrate a student's eligibility to receive state financial
1778 aid awards or tuition assistance grants. Falsification of such
1779 information shall result in the denial of a pending application
1780 and revocation of an award or grant currently held to the extent
1781 that no further payments shall be made. Additionally, students
1782 who knowingly make false statements in order to receive state
1783 financial aid awards or tuition assistance grants commit a
1784 misdemeanor of the second degree subject to the provisions of s.
1785 837.06 and shall be required to return all state financial aid
1786 awards or tuition assistance grants wrongfully obtained.
1787 Section 44. Paragraph (w) of subsection (2) of section
1788 435.04, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1789 435.04 Level 2 screening standards.—
1790 (2) The security background investigations under this
1791 section must ensure that persons subject to this section have
1792 not been arrested for and are awaiting final disposition of;
1793 have not been found guilty of, regardless of adjudication, or
1794 entered a plea of nolo contendere or guilty to; or have not been
1795 adjudicated delinquent and the record has not been sealed or
1796 expunged for, any offense prohibited under any of the following
1797 provisions of state law or similar law of another jurisdiction:
1798 (w) Section 787.07, relating to human smuggling.
1799 Section 45. Paragraph (e) of subsection (4) and paragraph
1800 (i) of subsection (5) of section 456.074, Florida Statutes, are
Page 72 of 88
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb315-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 315 2026
1801 amended to read:
1802 456.074 Certain health care practitioners; immediate
1803 suspension of license.—
1804 (4) The department shall issue an emergency order
1805 suspending the license of a massage therapist and establishment
1806 as those terms are defined in chapter 480 upon receipt of
1807 information that the massage therapist; the designated
1808 establishment manager as defined in chapter 480; an employee of
1809 the establishment; a person with an ownership interest in the
1810 establishment; or, for a corporation that has more than $250,000
1811 of business assets in this state, the owner, officer, or
1812 individual directly involved in the management of the
1813 establishment has been arrested for committing or attempting,
1814 soliciting, or conspiring to commit, or convicted or found
1815 guilty of, or has entered a plea of guilty or nolo contendere
1816 to, regardless of adjudication, a violation of s. 796.07 or a
1817 felony offense under any of the following provisions of state
1818 law or a similar provision in another jurisdiction:
1819 (e) Section 787.07, relating to human smuggling.
1820 (5) The department shall issue an emergency order
1821 suspending the license of any health care practitioner who is
1822 arrested for committing or attempting, soliciting, or conspiring
1823 to commit any act that would constitute a violation of any of
1824 the following criminal offenses in this state or similar
1825 offenses in another jurisdiction:
Page 73 of 88
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb315-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 315 2026
1826 (i) Section 787.07, relating to human smuggling.
1827 Section 46. Paragraph (e) of subsection (6) of section
1828 480.041, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1829 480.041 Massage therapists; qualifications; licensure;
1830 endorsement.—
1831 (6) The board shall deny an application for a new or
1832 renewal license if an applicant has been convicted or found
1833 guilty of, or enters a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to,
1834 regardless of adjudication, a violation of s. 796.07(2)(a) which
1835 is reclassified under s. 796.07(7) or a felony offense under any
1836 of the following provisions of state law or a similar provision
1837 in another jurisdiction:
1838 (e) Section 787.07, relating to human smuggling.
1839 Section 47. Paragraph (e) of subsection (8) of section
1840 480.043, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1841 480.043 Massage establishments; requisites; licensure;
1842 inspection; human trafficking awareness training and policies.—
1843 (8) The department shall deny an application for a new or
1844 renewal license if an establishment owner or a designated
1845 establishment manager or, for a corporation that has more than
1846 $250,000 of business assets in this state, an establishment
1847 owner, a designated establishment manager, or any individual
1848 directly involved in the management of the establishment has
1849 been convicted of or entered a plea of guilty or nolo contendere
1850 to any misdemeanor or felony crime, regardless of adjudication,
Page 74 of 88
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb315-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 315 2026
1851 related to prostitution or related acts as described in s.
1852 796.07 or a felony offense under any of the following provisions
1853 of state law or a similar provision in another jurisdiction:
1854 (e) Section 787.07, relating to human smuggling.
1855 Section 48. Subsection (5) of section 501.9741, Florida
1856 Statutes, is amended to read:
1857 501.9741 Assisting in veterans' benefits matters.—
1858 (5) BACKGROUND SCREENING.—A provider must ensure that all
1859 individuals who directly assist a veteran in a veterans'
1860 benefits matter complete a level 2 background screening that
1861 screens for any offenses identified in s. 408.809(4) or s.
1862 435.04(2)(d), (e), or (nn) or (4) s. 435.04(2)(d), (e), or (oo)
1863 or (4) before entering into any agreement with a veteran for
1864 veterans' benefits matters. An individual must submit a full set
1865 of fingerprints to the Department of Law Enforcement or to a
1866 vendor, entity, or agency authorized by s. 943.053(13), which
1867 shall forward the fingerprints to the Department of Law
1868 Enforcement for state processing. The Department of Veterans'
1869 Affairs shall transmit the background screening results to the
1870 provider, which results must indicate whether an individual's
1871 background screening contains any of the offenses listed in this
1872 subsection. Fees for state and federal fingerprint processing
1873 must be borne by the provider or individual. The state cost for
1874 fingerprint processing is as provided in s. 943.053(3)(e). This
1875 subsection does not imply endorsement, certification, or
Page 75 of 88
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb315-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 315 2026
1876 regulation of providers by the Department of Veterans' Affairs.
1877 Section 49. Subsection (2) of section 775.30, Florida
1878 Statutes, is amended to read:
1879 775.30 Terrorism; defined; penalties.—
1880 (2) A person who violates s. 782.04(1)(a)1. or (2), s.
1881 782.065, s. 782.07(1), s. 782.09, s. 784.045, s. 784.07, s.
1882 787.01, s. 787.02, s. 787.07, s. 790.115, s. 790.15, s. 790.16,
1883 s. 790.161, s. 790.1615, s. 790.162, s. 790.166, s. 790.19, s.
1884 806.01, s. 806.031, s. 806.111, s. 815.06, s. 815.061, s.
1885 859.01, or s. 876.34, in furtherance of intimidating or coercing
1886 the policy of a government, or in furtherance of affecting the
1887 conduct of a government by mass destruction, assassination, or
1888 kidnapping, commits the crime of terrorism, a felony of the
1889 first degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083,
1890 or s. 775.084.
1891 Section 50. Subsection (1) of section 794.056, Florida
1892 Statutes, is amended to read:
1893 794.056 Rape Crisis Program Trust Fund.—
1894 (1) The Rape Crisis Program Trust Fund is created within
1895 the Department of Health for the purpose of providing funds for
1896 rape crisis centers in this state. Trust fund moneys shall be
1897 used exclusively for the purpose of providing services for
1898 victims of sexual assault. Funds credited to the trust fund
1899 consist of those funds collected as an additional court
1900 assessment in each case in which a defendant pleads guilty or
Page 76 of 88
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb315-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 315 2026
1901 nolo contendere to, or is found guilty of, regardless of
1902 adjudication, an offense provided in s. 775.21(6) and (10)(a),
1903 (b), and (g); s. 784.011; s. 784.021; s. 784.03; s. 784.041; s.
1904 784.045; s. 784.048; s. 784.07; s. 784.08; s. 784.081; s.
1905 784.082; s. 784.083; s. 784.085; s. 787.01(3); s. 787.02(3); s.
1906 787.025; s. 787.06; s. 787.07; s. 794.011; s. 794.05; s. 794.08;
1907 former s. 796.03; former s. 796.035; s. 796.04; s. 796.05; s.
1908 796.06; s. 796.07(2)(a)-(d) and (i); s. 800.03; s. 800.04; s.
1909 810.14; s. 810.145; s. 812.135; s. 817.025; s. 825.102; s.
1910 825.1025; s. 827.071; s. 836.10; s. 847.0133; s. 847.0135(2); s.
1911 847.0137; s. 847.0145; s. 943.0435(4)(c), (7), (8), (9)(a),
1912 (13), and (14)(c); or s. 985.701(1). Funds credited to the trust
1913 fund also shall include revenues provided by law, moneys
1914 appropriated by the Legislature, and grants from public or
1915 private entities.
1916 Section 51. Paragraph (d) of subsection (3) of section
1917 921.0022, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1918 921.0022 Criminal Punishment Code; offense severity
1919 ranking chart.—
1920 (3) OFFENSE SEVERITY RANKING CHART
1921 (d) LEVEL 4
1922
Florida Felony
Statute Degree Description
1923
Page 77 of 88
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb315-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 315 2026
104.155 3rd Unqualified noncitizen electors
voting; aiding or soliciting
noncitizen electors in voting.
1924
499.0051(1) 3rd Failure to maintain or deliver
transaction history,
transaction information, or
transaction statements.
1925
499.0051(5) 2nd Knowing sale or delivery, or
possession with intent to sell,
contraband prescription drugs.
1926
517.07(1) 3rd Failure to register securities.
1927
517.12(1) 3rd Failure of dealer or associated
person of a dealer of
securities to register.
1928
784.031 3rd Battery by strangulation.
1929
784.07(2)(b) 3rd Battery of law enforcement
officer, firefighter, etc.
1930
784.074(1)(c) 3rd Battery of sexually violent
Page 78 of 88
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb315-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 315 2026
predators facility staff.
1931
784.075 3rd Battery on detention or
commitment facility staff.
1932
784.078 3rd Battery of facility employee by
throwing, tossing, or expelling
certain fluids or materials.
1933
784.08(2)(c) 3rd Battery on a person 65 years of
age or older.
1934
784.081(3) 3rd Battery on specified official
or employee.
1935
784.082(3) 3rd Battery by detained person on
visitor or other detainee.
1936
784.083(3) 3rd Battery on code inspector.
1937
784.085 3rd Battery of child by throwing,
tossing, projecting, or
expelling certain fluids or
materials.
1938
Page 79 of 88
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb315-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 315 2026
787.03(1) 3rd Interference with custody;
wrongly takes minor from
appointed guardian.
1939
787.04(2) 3rd Take, entice, or remove child
beyond state limits with
criminal intent pending custody
proceedings.
1940
787.04(3) 3rd Carrying child beyond state
lines with criminal intent to
avoid producing child at
custody hearing or delivering
to designated person.
1941
787.07 3rd Human smuggling.
1942
790.115(1) 3rd Exhibiting firearm or weapon
within 1,000 feet of a school.
1943
790.115(2)(b) 3rd Possessing electric weapon or
device, destructive device, or
other weapon on school
property.
1944
Page 80 of 88
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb315-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 315 2026
790.115(2)(c) 3rd Possessing firearm on school
property.
1945
794.051(1) 3rd Indecent, lewd, or lascivious
touching of certain minors.
1946
800.04(7)(c) 3rd Lewd or lascivious exhibition;
offender less than 18 years.
1947
806.135 2nd Destroying or demolishing a
memorial or historic property.
1948
810.02(4)(a) 3rd Burglary, or attempted
burglary, of an unoccupied
structure; unarmed; no assault
or battery.
1949
810.02(4)(b) 3rd Burglary, or attempted
burglary, of an unoccupied
conveyance; unarmed; no assault
or battery.
1950
810.06 3rd Burglary; possession of tools.
1951
810.08(2)(c) 3rd Trespass on property, armed
Page 81 of 88
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb315-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 315 2026
with firearm or dangerous
weapon.
1952
810.145(3)(b) 3rd Digital voyeurism
dissemination.
1953
812.014(2)(c)3. 3rd Grand theft, 3rd degree $10,000
or more but less than $20,000.
1954
812.014 3rd Grand theft, 3rd degree;
(2)(c)4. & specified items.
6.-10.
1955
812.014(2)(d)2. 3rd Grand theft, 3rd degree; $750
or more taken from dwelling or
its unenclosed curtilage.
1956
812.014(2)(e)3. 3rd Petit theft, 1st degree; less
than $40 taken from dwelling or
its unenclosed curtilage with
two or more prior theft
convictions.
1957
812.0195(2) 3rd Dealing in stolen property by
use of the Internet; property
Page 82 of 88
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb315-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 315 2026
stolen $300 or more.
1958
817.505(4)(a) 3rd Patient brokering.
1959
817.563(1) 3rd Sell or deliver substance other
than controlled substance
agreed upon, excluding s.
893.03(5) drugs.
1960
817.568(2)(a) 3rd Fraudulent use of personal
identification information.
1961
817.5695(3)(c) 3rd Exploitation of person 65 years
of age or older, value less
than $10,000.
1962
817.625(2)(a) 3rd Fraudulent use of scanning
device, skimming device, or
reencoder.
1963
817.625(2)(c) 3rd Possess, sell, or deliver
skimming device.
1964
828.125(1) 2nd Kill, maim, or cause great
bodily harm or permanent
Page 83 of 88
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb315-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 315 2026
breeding disability to any
registered horse or cattle.
1965
836.14(2) 3rd Person who commits theft of a
sexually explicit image with
intent to promote it.
1966
836.14(3) 3rd Person who willfully possesses
a sexually explicit image with
certain knowledge, intent, and
purpose.
1967
837.02(1) 3rd Perjury in official
proceedings.
1968
837.021(1) 3rd Make contradictory statements
in official proceedings.
1969
838.022 3rd Official misconduct.
1970
839.13(2)(a) 3rd Falsifying records of an
individual in the care and
custody of a state agency.
1971
839.13(2)(c) 3rd Falsifying records of the
Page 84 of 88
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb315-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 315 2026
Department of Children and
Families.
1972
843.021 3rd Possession of a concealed
handcuff key by a person in
custody.
1973
843.025 3rd Deprive law enforcement,
correctional, or correctional
probation officer of means of
protection or communication.
1974
843.15(1)(a) 3rd Failure to appear while on bail
for felony (bond estreature or
bond jumping).
1975
843.19(2) 2nd Injure, disable, or kill
police, fire, or SAR canine or
police horse.
1976
847.0135(5)(c) 3rd Lewd or lascivious exhibition
using computer; offender less
than 18 years.
1977
870.01(3) 2nd Aggravated rioting.
Page 85 of 88
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb315-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 315 2026
1978
870.01(5) 2nd Aggravated inciting a riot.
1979
874.05(1)(a) 3rd Encouraging or recruiting
another to join a criminal
gang.
1980
893.13(2)(a)1. 2nd Purchase of cocaine (or other
s. 893.03(1)(a), (b), or (d),
(2)(a), (2)(b), or (2)(c)5.
drugs).
1981
914.14(2) 3rd Witnesses accepting bribes.
1982
914.22(1) 3rd Force, threaten, etc., witness,
victim, or informant.
1983
914.23(2) 3rd Retaliation against a witness,
victim, or informant, no bodily
injury.
1984
916.1085 3rd Introduction of specified
(2)(c)1. contraband into certain DCF
facilities.
1985
Page 86 of 88
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb315-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 315 2026
934.215 3rd Use of two-way communications
device to facilitate commission
of a crime.
1986
944.47(1)(a)6. 3rd Introduction of contraband
(cellular telephone or other
portable communication device)
into correctional institution.
1987
951.22(1)(h), 3rd Intoxicating drug,
(j) & (k) instrumentality or other device
to aid escape, or cellular
telephone or other portable
communication device introduced
into county detention facility.
1988
1989 Section 52. Section 938.085, Florida Statutes, is amended
1990 to read:
1991 938.085 Additional cost to fund rape crisis centers.—In
1992 addition to any sanction imposed when a person pleads guilty or
1993 nolo contendere to, or is found guilty of, regardless of
1994 adjudication, a violation of s. 775.21(6) and (10)(a), (b), and
1995 (g); s. 784.011; s. 784.021; s. 784.03; s. 784.041; s. 784.045;
1996 s. 784.048; s. 784.07; s. 784.08; s. 784.081; s. 784.082; s.
1997 784.083; s. 784.085; s. 787.01(3); s. 787.02(3); 787.025; s.
Page 87 of 88
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb315-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 315 2026
1998 787.06; s. 787.07; s. 794.011; s. 794.05; s. 794.08; former s.
1999 796.03; former s. 796.035; s. 796.04; s. 796.05; s. 796.06; s.
2000 796.07(2)(a)-(d) and (i); s. 800.03; s. 800.04; s. 810.14; s.
2001 810.145; s. 812.135; s. 817.025; s. 825.102; s. 825.1025; s.
2002 827.071; s. 836.10; s. 847.0133; s. 847.0135(2); s. 847.0137; s.
2003 847.0145; s. 943.0435(4)(c), (7), (8), (9)(a), (13), and
2004 (14)(c); or s. 985.701(1), the court shall impose a surcharge of
2005 $151. Payment of the surcharge shall be a condition of
2006 probation, community control, or any other court-ordered
2007 supervision. The sum of $150 of the surcharge shall be deposited
2008 into the Rape Crisis Program Trust Fund established within the
2009 Department of Health by chapter 2003-140, Laws of Florida. The
2010 clerk of the court shall retain $1 of each surcharge that the
2011 clerk of the court collects as a service charge of the clerk's
2012 office.
2013 Section 53. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 88 of 88
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb315-00